Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.63.050

Programs and activities exempt from chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to the initiation of or changes in academic or vocational programs of instruction in the institutions' regular, extension, evening, or continuing education programs, or the fees therefor, fees for services provided in the practicum aspects of instruction, or research programs, and in extracurricular or residential life programs, including residence halls, food services, athletic and recreational programs, and performing arts programs.

[ 1987 c 97 s 5.]